Maine, session 132, LD1315.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §523, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2017, c. 8, §1, is further
amended to read:
5. Special commemorative decals for medals, badges or ribbons awarded. The
Secretary of State may issue special commemorative decals for use with special veterans
registration plates to any person who served in the uniformed services of the United States
Armed Forces, was honorably discharged and was awarded a medal, badge or ribbon
described in paragraphs A to BB CC when that person's application is accompanied by the
appropriate military certification verifying that the medal, badge or ribbon was awarded to
the applicant. One set of commemorative decals may be issued for each set of special
veterans registration plates issued under this section. One set of 2 commemorative decals
must be displayed on the front and back plates. The fee for a set of commemorative decals
may not exceed $5.
Special commemorative decals may be issued to applicants awarded the following medals,
badges or ribbons:
A. Distinguished Service Cross;
B. Navy Cross;
C. Air Force Cross;
D. Silver Star;
E. Distinguished Flying Cross;
F. Bronze Star;
G. Soldier's Medal;
H. Navy or Marine Corps Medal;
I. Airman's Medal;
Page 1 - 132LR1850(03)

J. Coast Guard Medal;
K. Asiatic-Pacific Campaign Medal;
L. European-African-Middle Eastern Campaign Medal;
M. Korean Service Medal;
N. Vietnam Service Medal;
O. Southwest Asia Service Medal;
P. Armed Forces Expeditionary Medal;
Q. Kosovo Service Medal;
R. Korea Defense Service Medal;
S. Global War on Terrorism Medal;
T. Iraq Campaign Medal;
U. Afghanistan Campaign Medal;
V. United States Army Combat Infantry Badge;
W. United States Army Combat Medic Badge;
X. United States Army Combat Action Badge;
Y. United States Navy, Marine Corps or Coast Guard Combat Action Ribbon;
Z. United States Air Force Combat Action Medal;
AA. National Emergency Service Medal; and
BB. Air Medal.; and
CC. Inherent Resolve Campaign Medal.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §523, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 453, §2 and affected
by §4, is amended to read:
6. Special commemorative decals for branches of armed forces. The Secretary of
State may issue special commemorative decals for use with special veterans registration
plates to any person who served in the uniformed services of the United States Armed
Forces and was honorably discharged when that person's application is accompanied by the
appropriate military certification verifying the applicant's service. One set of
commemorative decals may be issued for each set of special veterans registration plates
issued under this section. One set of 2 commemorative decals must be displayed on the
front and back plate. The fee for a set of commemorative decals may not exceed $5.
Special commemorative decals may be issued to applicants who served in the:
A. United States Army;
B. United States Air Force;
C. United States Navy;
D. United States Marine Corps; or
E. United States Coast Guard.;
Page 2 - 132LR1850(03)

F. United States Space Force;
G. United States Public Health Service Commissioned Corps; and
H. National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration Commissioned Officer Corps.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides funding for medal decals and related costs.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,190 $933
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $1,190 $933
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for computer programming.
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,056 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $7,056 $0
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
HIGHWAY FUND $8,246 $933
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $8,246 $933
Page 3 - 132LR1850(03)